Maine, session 132, LD1530.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 24-A MRSA §4303-F, as amended by PL 2023, c. 468, §2 and c. 591, §§3
and 4, is further amended by amending the section headnote to read:
§4303-F. Reimbursement for ambulance services and nontransporting emergency
medical services; participation of ambulance and nontransporting emergency
medical service providers in carrier networks
Sec. 2. 24-A MRSA §4303-F, sub-§1, as amended by PL 2023, c. 591, §3, is
further amended to read:
1. Reimbursement for ambulance and nontransporting emergency medical
services. With respect to a bill for covered services rendered by an ambulance service or
nontransporting emergency medical service provider, a carrier shall reimburse the
ambulance service or nontransporting emergency medical service provider or enrollee, as
applicable, as follows.
A. If the ambulance service or nontransporting emergency medical service provider
participates in the carrier's network, the carrier shall reimburse at the ambulance service
provider's or nontransporting emergency medical service provider's rate or 200% of the
Medicare rate for that service, whichever is less, plus any adjustment required by
paragraph C.
B. If the ambulance service or nontransporting emergency medical service provider is
an out-of-network provider, the carrier shall reimburse at the ambulance service
provider's or nontransporting emergency medical services provider's rate or 180% of
the Medicare rate for that service, whichever is less, plus any adjustment required by
paragraph C.
C. If the ambulance service or nontransporting emergency medical service provider is
located in a rural or super rural area as designated by the federal Department of Health
and Human Services, Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services and eligible for
additional Medicare reimbursement for services that were provided to a Medicare
enrollee, the carrier shall increase the reimbursement to that ambulance service
provider or nontransporting emergency medical service provider in the same amount
as the additional Medicare reimbursement.
D. If, on the effective date of this subsection in the case of an ambulance service
provider or on October 1, 2025 in the case of a nontransporting emergency medical
service provider, an ambulance service provider's or a nontransporting emergency
medical service provider's charge for ambulance services is below 200% of the
Medicare rate for that service, the ambulance service provider or nontransporting
emergency medical service provider may not increase the charge for that service by
more than 5% annually.
E. A carrier may not require a ground ambulance service provider or nontransporting
emergency medical service provider to obtain prior authorization before transporting
an enrollee to a hospital, between hospitals or from a hospital to a nursing home,
hospice care facility or other health care facility, as defined in Title 22, section 328,
subsection 8. A carrier may not require an air ambulance service provider to obtain
Page 1 - 132LR1615(01)

413 prior authorization before transporting an enrollee to a hospital or between hospitals
424 for urgent care.
Notwithstanding this subsection, a carrier is not required to reimburse an ambulance service
provider at the reimbursement rates required in this subsection for covered services
delivered through community paramedicine in accordance with Title 32, section 84,
subsection 4 and a carrier may require an ambulance service provider to obtain prior
authorization before providing services through community paramedicine.
As used in this subsection, "nontransporting emergency medical service" has the same
meaning as in Title 32, section 83, subsection 14.
Sec. 3. 32 MRSA §86, sub-§2-A, as amended by PL 2019, c. 627, Pt. B, §9, is
further amended to read:
2-A. Treatment. When an ambulance service or nontransporting emergency medical
service is present at an accident or other situation in which a person or persons require
emergency medical treatment, the medical treatment of the patients must be carried out in
accordance with any rules adopted under this chapter, any protocols as defined in section
83, subsection 19 and any orders given by online medical control; and is reimbursable care
under Title 24-A, section 4303-F when provided on scene regardless of transport to another
facility, except that:
A. When a patient is already under the supervision of a personal physician or physician
assistant or a nurse practitioner supervised by the physician and the physician,
physician assistant or nurse practitioner assumes the care of the patient, then for as long
as the physician, physician assistant or nurse practitioner remains with the patient, the
patient must be cared for as the physician, physician assistant or nurse practitioner
directs. The emergency medical services persons shall assist to the extent that their
licenses and protocol allow; and
B. A patient is not required to accept treatment to which the patient does not consent.
Sec. 4. 32 MRSA §86, sub-§4, as amended by PL 2023, c. 161, §6, is further
amended to read:
4. Naloxone hydrochloride or another opioid overdose-reversing medication. An
ambulance service or a nontransporting emergency medical service licensed under this
chapter may dispense naloxone hydrochloride or another opioid overdose-reversing
medication as reimbursable care under Title 24-A, section 4303-F in accordance with Title
22, section 2353, subsection 2‑A and the rules adopted and protocols developed for
ambulance services and nontransporting emergency medical services under this chapter.
An opioid overdose-reversing medication referenced in this subsection must be approved
by the federal Food and Drug Administration.